District of Columbia statutes.
18-307

Advancement as satisfaction of devise or bequest.

An advancement or a provision for an advancement to a person is a satisfaction, in whole or in part, of a devise or bequest to that person contained in a previous will if it would be so deemed in case the devisee or legatee were the child of the testator; and, whether he is a child or not, it shall be so deemed where it appears from parol or other evidence to be so intended.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 689, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Cross References

Advancements to child or descendant, see § 19-319.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-307.
1973 Ed., § 18-307.